Utah statutes.
63H-1-706.   Authority chief financial officer is a public treasurer -- Certain authority funds are public funds.

(1)  The authority's chief financial officer:

(a)  is a public treasurer, as defined in Section 51-7-3; and

(b)  shall invest the authority funds specified in Subsection (2) as provided in that subsection.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection 63E-2-110(2)(a), tax increment funds, municipal services revenue, and appropriations that the authority receives from the state:

(a)  are public funds; and

(b)  shall be invested as provided in Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.

